Arkansas, session 2025, HB1925.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-5-409(b)(4)(A)(iii), concerning the
materials furnished to qualified electors for absentee ballots, is amended to
read as follows:
(iii) The voter statement shall include the
following statement in bold capitalized letters at the bottom of the page: “I
AM DULY QUALIFIED TO VOTE AT THIS ELECTION ACCORDING TO THE ARKANSAS
CONSTITUTION, I HAVE NOT YET VOTED DURING THIS ELECTION, THE BALLOT OR
BALLOTS CONTAINED IN THIS ENVELOPE IS MY BALLOT, AND I HAVE RECEIVED NO
ASSISTANCE IN VOTING MY BALLOT THAT I WOULD NOT HAVE BEEN ENTITLED TO RECEIVE
HAD I VOTED IN PERSON AT MY VOTING PRECINCT. THE INFORMATION I HAVE PROVIDED
IS TRUE TO THE BEST OF MY KNOWLEDGE UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY. IF I HAVE
PROVIDED FALSE INFORMATION, I MAY BE SUBJECT TO A FINE OF UP TO TEN THOUSAND
DOLLARS ($10,000) OR IMPRISONMENT FOR UP TO TEN (10) YEARS, OR BOTH, UNDER
*SSS304*
04-03-2025 12:13:10 SSS304

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1925
FEDERAL OR STATE LAWS.”

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-5-409(b)(4)(C), concerning the materials
furnished to qualified electors for absentee ballots, is amended to read as
follows:
(C)(i) The voter statement shall include a sworn statement
portion that may be completed by the voter stating that the voter is
registered to vote and that he or she is the person who is registered.
(ii) The sworn statement portion of the voter
statement is not required to be notarized, but the voter shall execute the
sworn statement under penalty of perjury.
(iii)(a) The signing of the sworn statement shall be
witnessed by at least one (1) individual who is eighteen (18) years of age or
older.
(b) The witnessing requirement under
subdivision (b)(4)(C)(iii)(a) of this section shall not apply to a voter who
has applied for his or her absentee ballot due to one (1) of the following,
as evidenced by his or her absentee voting application:
(1) The voter is unable to attend the
polls on election day because of an illness or physical disability;
(2) The voter is a resident of a long-
term care or residential facility licensed by the state;
(3) The voter is unable to attend the
polls on election day due to an observance of a religious discipline or
religious holiday; or
(4) The voter:
(a) Is in active service as a
member of the armed services of the United States or the voter is a spouse or
a dependent of a person who is in active service as a member of the armed
services of the United States; and
(b) Resides outside the county.
(D) Blank fields shall be provided for the witness of the
sworn statement's signature to provide his or her:
(i) Printed name;
(ii) Signature; and
(iii) Mailing address;
04-03-2025 12:13:10 SSS304

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1925

/s/Beaty Jr.


































04-03-2025 12:13:10 SSS304